Massachusetts, session 194th, H1209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be a special commission to: (i) evaluate the Commonwealth’s 
current unemployment policies and assess their effect on the health and growth of Massachusetts 
small businesses, and (ii) make recommendations to improve the existing unemployment 
insurance procedures in regard to fostering economic growth and incentivizing employers to hire 
additional workers. The commission shall file its findings and recommendations, together with 
drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, with the clerks of the 
senate and the house of representatives not later than December 31, 2027.   
The commission shall consist of 1 member who shall be appointed by the speaker of the 
house of representatives; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the house 
of representatives; 1 member who shall be appointed by the senate president; 1 member who 
shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; the secretary of labor and workforce 
development or a designee; the secretary of economic development or a designee; the chair of 

of 2 13 the joint committee on community development and small business; the chair of the joint 
committee on labor and workforce development; the chair of the joint committee on economic 
development and emerging technologies; and 1 member to be appointed by each of the following 
organizations: Associated Industries of Massachusetts, the Massachusetts Restaurant 
Association, the Massachusetts chapter of the National Federation of Independent Businesses, 
and the Massachusetts State Labor Council.